South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S343.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 29, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-29-175. (A) Prior to administering the Pfizer-BioNTech COVID-19 vaccination, the person administering the vaccine must verbally notify the person receiving the vaccine that the vaccine is a new vaccine, that the vaccine is contaminated by the presence of fragments of bacterial plasmid DNA encapsulated in a lipid nanoparticle delivery vehicle, and that the long-term safety of the vaccine is unknown. (B) The person to whom the vaccine will be administered must, prior to receiving the vaccine, sign and date a written notice that states that the vaccine is a new vaccine, the vaccine is contaminated by the presence of fragments of bacterial plasmid DNA encapsulated in a lipid nanoparticle delivery vehicle, and the long-term safety of the vaccine is unknown. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----